District of Columbia statutes.
2-215.05

Repealed

Minority Business Opportunity Commission — Reports.

Repealed.

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-95, § 6, 23 DCR 9532b
Sept. 13, 1980, D.C. Law 3-91, § 5(a), (b), 27 DCR 3280
Apr. 12, 2000, D.C. Law 13-91, § 117(c), 47 DCR 520
1981 Ed., § 1-1145.
1973 Ed., § 1-855.